Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-330
Violation; penalty;
injunctions.

Each violation of the Airport Zoning Act or of any regulations,
orders, or rulings
promulgated or made pursuant to the
act shall constitute a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day a
violation continues to exist shall constitute a separate offense. In addition,
the political subdivision or agency adopting zoning regulations under the act may institute, in
any court of competent jurisdiction, an action to prevent, restrain, correct, or abate any violation of
(1) the act, (2) airport zoning
regulations adopted under the
act, or (3) any order or ruling made in connection with the administration or enforcement of the act or such regulations.
The court in such proceedings shall adjudge to the plaintiff such relief by
way of injunction, which may be mandatory or otherwise, as may be proper under
all the facts and circumstances of the case in order to fully effectuate the
purposes of the act and
of the regulations adopted and orders and rulings made pursuant thereto.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 12, p. 690;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 30;

Laws 2013, LB140, § 19.